Utah statutes.
31A-20-103.   Classifications of insurance.
The commissioner may by rule define lines and classes of insurance which are
not already defined under Section 31A-1-301.  These definitions may be used
for any purposes within the commissioner's regulatory power, including:
(1)  providing instructions for reports and replies under Section 31A-2-202;
(2)  controlling combinations of lines or classes of insurance; and
(3)  determining which rules under Chapter 22 are applicable.
